Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5440.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 12-7 of the General Laws entitled "Arrest" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following section:
12-7-1.1. Detention by university or college security.
(a) The governing board of any private state-charted institution of higher education which
maintains a campus or other real property for educational purposes may establish a security, public
safety office, or similar department, which employs or contracts with special police officers, public
safety officers, security personnel or similar individuals. The appointment of special police officers,
and the powers granted to those individuals shall be governed by chapter 2.1 of title 12. If so
appointed by an institution, other duly trained members of such a department, including non-sworn
public safety officers and security guards may, without a warrant, detain any person for any
criminal offense, whenever the public safety officer or security guard has reasonable grounds to
believe that an offense has been committed within the jurisdiction of that public safety officer or
security guard and the officer or guard has reason to believe that the person being detained, is
responsible for the commission of said criminal offense.
(b) Any public safety officer or security guard that detains any individual for the suspected
commission of a criminal offense shall immediately request assistance from either the state police
or the local police department having jurisdiction over the private college or university and shall
not detain any person beyond a reasonable period of not greater than thirty (30) minutes, while
waiting for state or local police assistance.

(c) All public safety officers and security guards employed by any private college or
university subject to this section shall be trained in the proper use of restraint devices and shall
abide by locally or nationally recognized use of force policies.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001393
========
LC001393 - Page 2 of 3